North Carolina, session 2025, SB777.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. PRESIDENT PRO TEMPORE'S RECOMMENDATIONS
SECTION 1.1. Effective immediately, Renee Dowdy of Currituck County is
appointed to the College of The Albemarle Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2026,
to fill the unexpired term of Dr. Andrea Williams.
SECTION 1.2. Effective immediately, Linda Tolentino of Chatham County is
appointed to the Acupuncture Licensing Board for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
PART II. SPEAKER'S RECOMMENDATIONS
SECTION 2.1. Effective immediately, Kathy G. Lauten of Perquimans County is
appointed to the College of The Albemarle Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2027,
to fill the unexpired term of Edward Thornton.
SECTION 2.2. Kevin W. Earp of Johnston County is appointed to the Eastern North
Carolina School for the Deaf Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2026, to fill the
unexpired term of Patrick Miller.
PART III. CORRECTIONS
SECTION 3.1. Section 2.2 of S.L. 2025-90 is repealed.
*S777-v-3*

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4.1. This act is effective when it becomes law. Unless otherwise provided,
terms begin upon the effective date of this act.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 23rd day of October,
2025.
s/ Ralph Hise
Presiding Officer of the Senate
s/ Howard Penny, Jr.
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
Page 2 Session Law 2025-96 Senate Bill 777